Colorado, session 2026A, HB1386.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-7.4-302, amend
(3)(a), (3)(b), and (7) as follows:
23-7.4-302. Tuition waiver for members of the National Guard
- rules - fund - legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
(3) (a) Subject to annual appropriations, a person who is a member
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

of the Colorado National Guard, upon being accepted for enrollment at a
designated institution of higher education, may pursue studies that lead to
a postgraduate degree, a bachelor's degree, an associate degree, or a
certificate of completion. with all tuition waived. EACH DESIGNATED
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL, FOR A MEMBER WHO IS
ACCEPTED FOR ENROLLMENT, WAIVE THE REMAINING BALANCE OF TUITION
COST IN EXCESS OF THE AMOUNT OF ANY PRIVATE, STATE, OR FEDERAL
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE RECEIVED BY THE MEMBER. For a member, the
tuition waiver must not exceed more than sixty-five credit hours at a
designated two-year institution of higher education and no more than one
hundred thirty credit hours at a designated four-year institution of higher
education; except that the total credit hours for a member who attends both
a designated two-year and a designated four-year institution of higher
education must not exceed more than one hundred forty-five credit hours.
The department of military and veterans affairs shall administer the tuition
waiver program.
(b) (I) To prevent hardship to a designated institution of higher
education, if there is a significant increase in the member enrollment in the
tuition waiver program, the number of members attending with a tuition
waiver must not exceed the greater of: THE DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND
VETERANS AFFAIRS SHALL REIMBURSE A DESIGNATED INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION FOR FIFTY PERCENT OF THE COST OF MEMBERS' TUITION
THAT IS WAIVED BY THE INSTITUTION PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL APPROPRIATE MONEY TO THE COLORADO
NATIONAL GUARD TUITION FUND, CREATED IN SUBSECTION (9) OF THIS
SECTION, TO COVER FIFTY PERCENT OF THE COST OF TUITION WAIVED AT
EACH DESIGNATED INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION.
(A) A twenty-five percent increase in member enrollment in a
designated institution of higher education compared to the member
calculation described in subsection (3)(b)(II) of this section; or
(B) More than five additional members enrolled in a designated
institution of higher education compared to the member calculation
described in subsection (3)(b)(II) of this section.
(II) For each designated institution of higher education, the
department of military and veterans affairs shall determine the base member
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1386

enrollment described in subsection (3)(b)(I)(A) or (3)(b)(I)(B) of this
section by calculating the average fall semester member enrollment at the
designated institution of higher education for the previous three fall
semesters. The department of military and veterans affairs, in consultation
with designated institutions of higher education, shall adopt rules to
determine how to select members to participate in the tuition waiver
program if a significant increase in member enrollment in the tuition waiver
program occurs pursuant to subsection (3)(b)(I) of this section.
(III) The department of military and veterans affairs shall determine
community college member enrollment caps for each community college.
The department of military and veterans affairs shall provide funds to the
state board of community colleges and occupational education for tuition
waivers. The state board of community colleges and occupational education
shall distribute the funds to each community college in which a member is
enrolled.
(IV) (A) The department of military and veterans affairs may request
adjustments to the annual appropriation based on changes to Colorado
National Guard member enrollment and changes to the cost of tuition.
(B) If the difference between the calculated tuition for base member
enrollment, as described in subsection (3)(b)(II) of this section, and the
annual appropriation is less than twenty-five percent, the department of
military and veterans affairs may prorate funding and distribute funds to
each designated institution of higher education proportionately.
(C) If the difference between the calculated tuition for base member
enrollment, as described in subsection (3)(b)(II) of this section, and the
annual appropriation is more than twenty-five percent, the tuition waiver
program is suspended and the designated institutions of higher education
shall distribute the remaining tuition waiver funds on a first-come,
first-serve basis to members until the tuition waiver funds are exhausted.
(7) The department of military and veterans affairs shall adopt rules
to certify member eligibility at the request of a designated institution of
higher education, to communicate member eligibility to the designated
institution of higher education, and to administer the tuition waiver program
pursuant to this section, INCLUDING A PROCESS TO REIMBURSE A
DESIGNATED INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION FOR FIFTY PERCENT OF THE
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1386

COST OF TUITION WAIVED BY THE INSTITUTION.
SECTION 2. Effective date. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1386